Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.205.040

Fees—Rules—Priority for payment—Review of records.

(1)(a) From funds appropriated for that purpose, the superintendent of public instruction shall pay fees to a certified center on a monthly basis for each student enrolled in compliance with RCW 28A.205.020. The superintendent shall set fees by rule.

(b) Revisions in such fees proposed by an education center shall become effective after thirty days notice unless the superintendent finds such a revision is unreasonable in which case the revision shall not take effect. The administration of any test to earn a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 in accordance with rules adopted under RCW 28A.305.190 shall not be a part of such initial diagnostic procedure.

(c) Reimbursements shall not be made for students who are absent.

(d) No center shall make any charge to any student, or the student's parent, guardian or custodian, for whom a fee is being received under the provisions of this section.

(2) Payments shall be made from available funds first to those centers that have in the judgment of the superintendent demonstrated superior performance based upon consideration of students' educational gains taking into account such students' backgrounds, and upon consideration of cost-effectiveness. In considering the cost-effectiveness of nonprofit centers the superintendent shall take into account not only payments made under this section but also factors such as tax exemptions, direct and indirect subsidies or any other cost to taxpayers at any level of government which result from such nonprofit status.

(3) To be eligible for such payment, every such center, without prior notice, shall permit a review of its accounting records by personnel of the state auditor during normal business hours.

(4) If total funds for this purpose approach depletion, the superintendent shall notify the centers of the date after which further funds for reimbursement of the centers' services will be exhausted.

[ 2013 c 39 s 7; 2006 c 263 s 412; 1999 c 348 s 4; 1990 c 33 s 183; 1979 ex.s. c 174 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.97.040.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Intent—1999 c 348: See note following RCW 28A.205.010.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 174: See note following RCW 28A.205.020.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 341: See note following RCW 28A.205.010.